Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-3911
Judicial district public defender; appointment; salary; payment.

Within thirty days following receipt of a certification as provided in section 29-3910, the Governor shall authorize the judge or judges to appoint a public defender for the district. The salary and all expenses, including trial expense and expert witness fees, of the judicial district public defender shall be paid out of funds appropriated to the office of Governor for that purpose.

Laws 1969, c. 234, § 3, p. 864;

R.S.1943, (1989), § 29-1805.03;

Laws 1990, LB 822, § 29.